Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-805
Teachers or administrators without certificates; employment prohibited; effect.

The school board or board of education shall be personally liable for all public money paid to teachers or administrators who are not qualified under sections 79-806 to 79-815. A teacher or administrator violating such sections shall not recover any money for services while teaching during the time that such contract and certificate are invalid. Any person having knowledge of the employment by a school district of an uncertified teacher or administrator may prefer charges against the board.

Laws 1925, c. 181, § 2, p. 470;

C.S.1929, § 79-1311;

R.S.1943, § 79-1339;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 340, p. 804;

Laws 1965, c. 515, § 5, p. 1638;

Laws 1971, LB 802, § 5;

Laws 1988, LB 802, § 23;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1240;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 435;

Laws 2003, LB 685, § 5.

Teacher cannot recover for services rendered during time that contract and certificate are invalid. Johnson v. School Dist. No. 3 of Clay County, 168 Neb. 547, 96 N.W.2d 623 (1959).

Recovery cannot be had on contract or on quantum meruit where certificate has not been registered. Zevin v. School Dist. No. 11 of City of Cozad, 144 Neb. 100, 12 N.W.2d 634 (1944).